DI-496
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIAT1-01

DTC B0 113/42 Short in Side Squib RH Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The side squib RH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the side airbag assembly RH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.

DTC B0113/42 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the side squib RH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Shortin side squib RH circuit (to B+) « Side airbag assembly RH (Side squib RH)
B0113/42 « Side squib RH malfunction « Airbag sensorassembly
« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction e FloorNo.2wire
HINT:

DTC B0113/42 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-486.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check floor No. 2 wire (side squib RH circuit).

PREPARATION:

ON  FloorNo. 2 Wi
@ cortio e Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery, and wait
1 .. at least for 2 seconds.
Airbag CHECK:
Side Squib RH Sensor N .
laesqui Assembly (a) Turntheignition switchto ON.
:l (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and SFR+
& of the floor No. 2 wire connector on the side airbag assem-
bly RH (side squib RH) side.
OK:
:
@?ﬁ%‘ SFR+ Voltage: Below 1V
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c V)
H01019 - (_)\—/ (+)
L 16621 NG% bair or replace floor No. 2 wire.
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Floor No. 2 Wire
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PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(d) Using a service wire, connect SFR+ and SFR- of the floor
No. 2 wire connector on the side airbag assembly RH
(side squib RH) side.

(e) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
DTCBO 113/42is notoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0113/42 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 | Check side squib RH.
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H10600 H01068
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PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the side airbag assembly RH (side squib RH)
connector.

Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@)

HINT:

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCBO 113/42is notoutput.

Codes other than code B0113/42 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace side airbag assembly RH

(side squib RH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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